Hawaii statutes.
[§353‑35] Incarcerated
parents; data collection. Beginning on July 1, 2016, the department shall
collect the following data upon intake of offenders into the correctional
system:

(1) The number of offenders who are parents;

(2) The number of children under the age of eighteen,
per offender who is a parent; and

(3) Any other information about incarcerated parents
and their children that the department deems useful to facilitate the provision
of services to incarcerated parents or their children. [L 2015, c 16, §2]

Note

Forms or questions to ask offenders; plan for management
of data collected and public disclosure of data. L 2015, c 16, §3.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next